District of Columbia statutes.
29-412.02

Approval of dissolution.

(a)

The board of directors of a membership corporation may propose dissolution for submission to the members.

(b)

For a proposal to dissolve to be adopted:

(1)

The board of directors shall recommend dissolution to the members unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the members; and

(2)

The members entitled to vote must approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (e) of this section.

(c)

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution on any basis.

(d)

The nonprofit corporation shall give notice to each member, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed meeting of members. The notice shall also state:

(1)

That the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation; and

(2)

How the assets of the corporation will be distributed after all creditors have been paid or how the distribution of assets will be determined.

(e)

Unless the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, requires a greater vote or a greater number of members to be present, the adoption of the proposal to dissolve by the members shall require the approval of the members at a meeting at which a quorum exists, and, if any class of members is entitled to vote as a separate group on the proposal, the approval of each such separate voting group at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists.

(f)

If the nonprofit corporation does not have any members entitled to vote on its dissolution, a proposal to dissolve shall be adopted by the corporation when it has been adopted by the board of directors.

(g)

A charitable corporation shall give the Attorney General for the District of Columbia notice in the form of a record that it intends to dissolve before the time it delivers articles of dissolution to the Mayor. Notice to the Attorney General under this section shall not delay or otherwise affect the dissolution process.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720